Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-465
Limited liability partnership; applicability of act.

After January 1, 2001, the Uniform Partnership Act of 1998 governs all limited liability partnerships.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 65;

Laws 2008, LB707, § 3.